FST/englishtoy.xfst
### english-toy.xfst ###

# Classes
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ]; # vowels
define S [ s | z | x | c h | s h ]; # sibilants

read lexc english-toy.lexc
define Lexicon;


# E deletion: silent e dropped before -ing and -ed (make/making)
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;

# E insertion
define EInsertion [..] -> e || S "^" _ s ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;


define Grammar Lexicon .o. EDeletion .o. EInsertion ;

regex Grammar;
